Connecticut, session 2026, HB05110.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That chapter 219 of the general statutes be amended to (1) specify that
vehicles shared through a peer-to-peer car sharing platform or company
are subject to the nine and thirty-five-hundredths per cent sales and use
taxes rate applicable to the rental or leasing of a passenger motor vehicle
under sections 12-408 and 12-411 of the general statutes, and (2) deposit
the revenue generated from the tax on vehicles shared through such
platform or company in the Special Transportation Fund.